Florida, session 2026, HB1407.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (1), (3), and (5) of section
760.11, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
760.11 Administrative and civil remedies; construction.—
(1) Any person aggrieved by a violation of ss. 760.01-
760.10 may file a complaint with the commission within 365 days
of the alleged violation, naming the employer, employment
agency, labor organization, or joint labor-management committee,
or, in the case of an alleged violation of s. 760.10(5), the
person responsible for the violation and describing the
violation. Any person aggrieved by a violation of s. 509.092 may
file a complaint with the commission within 365 days of the
alleged violation, naming the person responsible for the
violation and describing the violation. The commission, a
commissioner, or the Attorney General may in like manner file
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1407 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1407 2026 Legislature
such a complaint. On the same day the complaint is filed with
the commission, the commission shall clearly stamp on the face
of the complaint the date the complaint was filed with the
commission. In lieu of filing the complaint with the commission,
a complaint under this section may be filed with the federal
Equal Employment Opportunity Commission or with any unit of
government of the state which is a fair-employment-practice
agency under 29 C.F.R. ss. 1601.70-1601.80. If the date the
complaint is filed is clearly stamped on the face of the
complaint, that date is the date of filing. The date the
complaint is filed with the commission for purposes of this
section is the earliest date of filing with the Equal Employment
Opportunity Commission, the fair-employment-practice agency, or
the commission. The complaint shall contain a short and plain
statement of the facts describing the violation and the relief
sought. The commission may require additional information to be
in the complaint. The commission, within 5 days of the complaint
being filed, shall by registered mail send a copy of the
complaint to the person who allegedly committed the violation.
The person who allegedly committed the violation may file an
answer to the complaint within 25 days of the date the complaint
was filed with the commission. Any answer filed shall be mailed
to the aggrieved person by the person filing the answer. Both
the complaint and the answer shall be verified.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (2), the commission
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1407 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1407 2026 Legislature
shall investigate the allegations in the complaint. Within 180
days of the filing of the complaint, the commission shall
determine if there is reasonable cause to believe that
discriminatory practice has occurred in violation of the Florida
Civil Rights Act of 1992. When the commission determines whether
or not there is reasonable cause, the commission by registered
mail shall promptly notify the aggrieved person and the
respondent of the reasonable cause determination, the date of
such determination, and the options available under this
section.
(5) In any civil action brought under this section, the
court may issue an order prohibiting the discriminatory practice
and providing affirmative relief from the effects of the
practice, including back pay. The court may also award
compensatory damages, including, but not limited to, damages for
mental anguish, loss of dignity, and any other intangible
injuries, and punitive damages. Sections The provisions of ss.
768.72 and 768.73 do not apply to this section. The judgment for
the total amount of punitive damages awarded under this section
to an aggrieved person shall not exceed $100,000. In any action
or proceeding under this subsection, the court, in its
discretion, may allow the prevailing party a reasonable attorney
attorney's fee as part of the costs. It is the intent of the
Legislature that this provision for attorney attorney's fees be
interpreted in a manner consistent with federal case law
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1407 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1407 2026 Legislature
involving a Title VII action. The right to trial by jury is
preserved in any such private right of action in which the
aggrieved person is seeking compensatory or punitive damages,
and any party may demand a trial by jury. The commission's
determination of reasonable cause is not admissible into
evidence in any civil proceeding, including any hearing or
trial, except to establish for the court the right to maintain
the private right of action. A civil action brought under this
section shall be commenced no later than 1 year after the date
of determination of reasonable cause by the commission or the
issuance of a Notice of Right to Sue by the Equal Employment
Opportunity Commission, whichever is earlier. If a determination
of reasonable cause is not made by the commission or a Notice of
Right to Sue is not issued by the Equal Employment Opportunity
Commission within 180 days after the filing of the complaint, a
civil action brought under this section may be commenced no
later than 18 months after the filing of the complaint. The
commencement of such action shall divest the commission of
jurisdiction of the complaint, except that the commission may
intervene in the civil action as a matter of right.
Notwithstanding the above, the state and its agencies and
subdivisions shall not be liable for punitive damages. The total
amount of recovery against the state and its agencies and
subdivisions shall not exceed the limitation as set forth in s.
100 768.28(5).
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1407 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1407 2026 Legislature
101 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1407 -01-er